Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 4

Division of Forestry

11-4-401. Creation — Administration and supervision.

There is created and established a division to be known as the division of forestry, which shall be administered as a division of the department of agriculture. The division will be under the direct supervision of the state forester.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.6 (Williams, § 630.7); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-401; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 11; T.C.A., § 11-4-101.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 11-4-401 — 11-4-404 (Acts 1957, ch. 18, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 11-430 — 11-433), concerning the federal land conservation program, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 1.

11-4-402. Purpose.

It is the purpose of the division to develop, implement, and promote those public forestry programs and policies that protect, conserve, and efficiently utilize the state's forest resources.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 11-4-401 — 11-4-404 (Acts 1957, ch. 18, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 11-430 — 11-433), concerning the federal land conservation program, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 1.

11-4-403. Acceptance of gifts.

The division of forestry is authorized to accept gifts, donations or contributions of land suitable for forestry purposes.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.14 (Williams, § 630.15); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-409; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 13; T.C.A., § 11-4-109.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 11-4-401 — 11-4-404 (Acts 1957, ch. 18, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 11-430 — 11-433), concerning the federal land conservation program, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 1.

11-4-404. Purchase of land.

The division and each county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state are empowered to expend money from available sources to purchase or to aid in the purchase of areas of land for forestry purposes within the meaning of this chapter, such areas to become the property of the state, to be improved, cared for and administered by the division for such purposes respectively.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.20 (Williams, § 630.23); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9 § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-415; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 14, T.C.A., § 11-4-115.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 11-4-401 — 11-4-404 (Acts 1957, ch. 18, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 11-430 — 11-433), concerning the federal land conservation program, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and Maintenance of County Roads in State Forests. OAG 15-50, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (6/8/15).

11-4-405. Forest protection.

The division is authorized to implement and develop programs to protect the state's forests.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 16.

11-4-406. Fire protection — Right of entry — Duty of care — Damages.

The division, through its authorized employees and agents, may, at any time, go upon any land within this state for the purpose of investigating, preventing, or controlling forest, woods, brush, or grass fires of any nature, or to take other action necessary for the control of forest disease, insects, and other pests without incurring liability for trespassing. This includes the right to take needed firefighting equipment onto and over such property, but such persons are charged with the responsibility of taking reasonable precautions to ensure minimum damages. However, nothing herein shall preclude any such property owner whose premises are entered upon for such purpose from recovering such property owner's actual damages where such person's property is damaged as a result of such entry or crossing, and the state board of claims, upon satisfactory proof of such damage and cause thereof, is authorized to make payments therefor to such injured property owner.

Acts 1963, ch. 144, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-434; Acts 1986, ch. 652, §§ 17, 47; T.C.A., § 11-4-120.

11-4-407. Local cooperation in protection from fire and forest pests.

The legislative bodies of counties within the state are authorized and empowered to cooperate with the division of forestry in the protection of forests within their respective counties from fire and forest pests.

The county legislative bodies are authorized to appropriate and pay out of the funds under their control, such amounts as may be deemed necessary, to carry out this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 18.

11-4-408. Agreements with federal agencies.

The division of forestry, with the approval of the commissioner, may execute agreements with federal agencies for providing fire detection, presuppression, and suppression services on federal lands.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 19.

11-4-409. Powers of division.

The division has the power to enforce all conservation laws and regulations of the state affecting matters or materials under the jurisdiction of the division.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.19 (Williams, § 630.22); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-414; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 20; T.C.A., § 11-4-114.

11-4-410. Liability for damages.

Any person, firm, or corporation negligently or willfully setting fires shall be civilly liable to the division for any expenses incurred in extinguishing such fires.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 21.

11-4-411. Rural community fire protection program.

The division is authorized to give grants to rural communities for the purposes of organizing, training, and equipping participating volunteer fire control organizations. Funds may be made available annually to organizations on a matching cost share basis. To qualify for funding and/or equipment, organizations must enter into cooperative fire protection agreements with the division. The division is authorized to prepare policies and procedures for implementation of the program and to include in the annual budget request such funding as is necessary to implement this section. There are hereby authorized to be appropriated annually such sums as may be needed to implement the rural community fire protection program.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 22.